Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-958
Special election by mail; supervision; election report; counting board.

The election commissioner or county clerk shall supervise the procedures for handling and canvassing the ballots to ensure the safety and confidentiality of all ballots properly cast. The election commissioner or county clerk shall file with the Secretary of State and the county board an election report. The Secretary of State shall develop a uniform election report form which requires information, including, but not limited to, an evaluation of the verification process including the number of ballots rejected and the reasons for the rejection, the process for handling and canvassing ballots, and the cost of the election conducted by mail. The election commissioner or county clerk shall appoint a counting board for the election in the same manner as the counting board for early voting and ballots shall be counted and canvassed in the same manner as much as possible.

Laws 1996, LB 964, § 11;

Laws 2005, LB 98, § 25.